Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.300

Agreement or order to contain detailed statement of powers and purposes.

The purposes for which each marketing agreement and order is issued and the powers which shall be exercised thereunder shall be stated in detail in the provisions of such agreement or order. Any such agreement or order or amendment thereto may contain provisions for the exercise of any one or more or all of the powers and purposes set forth in RCW 15.65.310 through 15.65.340. However, any agreement, order or amendment wherein the affected commodity is one of those listed below shall contain provisions for the exercise of only those powers and purposes contained in said RCW 15.65.310 through 15.65.340 set after its name below, to wit:

(1) Wheat, RCW 15.65.310, 15.65.320 and 15.65.330.

[ 1961 c 256 s 30.]